Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
STEM INVESTMENT COUNCIL AND STEM GRANTS
SECTION 1.  ORS 327.372 is amended to read:
327.372. (1) Activities related to science, technology, engineering and mathematics education and
activities related to career and technical education that can lead to high wage and high demand jobs
shall be funded as provided by this section.
[(2) The Department of Education shall distribute moneys in  the Connecting Education to Careers
Account established by ORS 327.376 as follows: ]
(2) The Department of Education  shall distribute moneys available to the department for
the purpose of this section as follows:
(a) Forty percent for activities related to  science, technology, engineering and mathematics ed-
ucation that are described in subsection (3) of this section. Moneys shall be  distributed by the de-
partment under this paragraph based on recommendations of the STEM Investment Council.
(b) Sixty percent  for activities related to career and technical education that can lead to high
wage and high demand jobs and that are described in subsection (4) of this section. Moneys shall
be distributed  by the department under this paragraph based on recommendations of the committee
established under ORS 344.075.
(3) Moneys distributed as provided by subsection (2)(a) of this  section to fund activities related
to science, technology, engineering and mathematics education shall be used to:
(a) [Expand and sustain regional networks that support ] Sustain a network  of entities that are
designated by regional partners to:
(A) Sustain and expand education in science,  technology, engineering and mathematics[ .]; and
(B) Coordinate efforts described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph with regional
partners that support  career and technical education and with local workforce development
boards.
(b) Award grants [ that] to an entity that is part of the network described in paragraph (a)
of this subsection to:
Enrolled House Bill 3038 (HB 3038-B) Page 1
(A) Expand the implementation of effective programs  related to science, technology, engineering
and mathematics[ , that];
(B) Propose innovative approaches or programs related to science, technology, engineering  and
mathematics [ or that ]; or
(C) Provide professional development related to teaching science, technology, engineering and
mathematics.
(c) Provide funding to recruit, retain and support underserved students, as defined by the  State
Board of Education by rule, for programs that :
(A) Are offered [ at] by entities that are part of the network described in paragraph (a) of
this subsection in collaboration with  community colleges and public universities [ and that];
(B) Can lead to high wage and high  demand jobs related to science, technology, engineering and
mathematics[.]; and
(C) Are in alignment with regional labor market needs, with the needs of regional part-
ners who represent industry and with regional career and technical education programs.
[(d) Develop a systematic survey of facility use to determine how savings  for science, technology,
engineering and mathematics education can be achieved. ]
[(e)] (d) Fund any other activities related to science,  technology,  engineering  and mathematics
education that are identified by the STEM Investment Council.
(4) Moneys distributed as provided by  subsection (2)(b) of this section to fund activities related
to career and technical education that can lead to high wage  and high demand jobs shall be used
for:
(a) Programs that expose  students to career and technical education programs that can lead to
high wage and high demand jobs.
(b) Career and Technical Education Revitalization grants awarded under ORS 344.075.
(c) Student leadership organizations related to career and technical education programs that can
lead to high wage and high demand jobs.
(d) Distribution to school districts to support career and  technical education programs in the
school district that are approved by the Department of  Education as being high quality and that can
lead to high wage and high demand jobs.  Moneys must be distributed to each school and public
charter school in the school district based on the number  of students enrolled at the school with the
following characteristics:
(A) Students who are enrolled in and earned three or more credits  for courses that are part of
a career and technical education program  that can lead to high wage and high demand jobs and that
are approved by the Department of Education.
(B) Students who acquire an industry credential that can lead to a high wage and  high demand
job and that is approved by the Department of Education.
(C) Students described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph who are historically under-
served, as defined by the State Board of Education by rule.
(e) Administration  of grants for the purpose of expanding teacher training programs and oppor-
tunities related to career and technical education that can lead to high wage and high demand jobs.
(f) Administration of a pilot program to increase students’ exposure and access  to career and
technical education that can lead to high wage and high demand jobs.
(g) Funding any other activities related to career and technical  education that can lead to high
wage and high demand jobs and that are identified by the committee established under ORS  344.075.
(5) Except as otherwise  provided, moneys distributed under subsections (3) and (4) of this section
shall be distributed to school districts, education service districts, public schools, public charter
schools, community colleges, public universities or statewide nonprofit organizations promoting stu-
dent leadership in career and technical education or any combination thereof or in partnership  with
youth job development organizations, as defined in ORS 344.415, other nonprofit  organizations or
other entities identified by the State Board of Education by rule.
(6) From the moneys available under subsection (2)  of this section, the Department of Education,
the STEM Investment Council and the committee established under ORS 344.075  combined may re-
Enrolled House Bill 3038 (HB 3038-B) Page 2
tain no  more than a total of five percent of all moneys distributed for a fiscal year for administrative
expenses incurred under this section.
(7) The Department of  Education, in collaboration with the STEM Investment Council and the
committee established under ORS 344.075, shall submit a  biennial report to the Legislative Assembly
related to distributions made under this section. The report  must include metrics that identify how
distributions  made under this section are contributing to the development of a skilled workforce that
is able to secure high wage and high demand jobs.
SECTION 2.  ORS 327.380 is amended to read:
327.380. (1) The STEM Investment Grant Program is established to provide  funding to school
districts, education service districts,  community  colleges and public universities listed in ORS
352.002 to advance the goals described in ORS 326.500 (2).
(2) The STEM Investment Council shall evaluate grant applications and  make recommendations
on the  applications to the Superintendent of Public Instruction. Under the direction of the Super-
intendent of Public Instruction, the Department of Education shall distribute moneys for the  grant
program and otherwise administer the grant program.
(3)(a) An application for a grant awarded under this section may be submitted by:
[(A) A school district; ]
[(B) A community college district; ]
[(C) A public university; ]
[(D) The Department of Education; ]
[(E) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission; ]
[(F) Any other state agency; or ]
[(G) Any combination  of entities identified in this paragraph that are organized as a partnership
or a regional effort to improve student achievement  in science, technology, engineering or
mathematics.]
(A) An entity that is part of the network  of entities that is designated by regional part-
ners to:
(i) Sustain and expand education in science, technology,  engineering and mathematics;
and
(ii) Coordinate efforts described  in sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph with re-
gional partners that support career and  technical education and with local workforce devel-
opment boards; or
(B) A school district, education service district, community college or public  university
listed in ORS 352.002 on behalf of one or more entities described in subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph.
(b) A grant awarded under this section may be used for:
(A) Classroom  or extracurricular activities that further the development of skills related to
science, technology, engineering or mathematics; or
(B) A project that is :
(i) Related to science, technology, engineering or mathematics  and that involves collaboration
with a private entity[ .];
(ii) Designed to increase the awareness of potential careers  in science, technology, engi-
neering or mathematics; or
(iii) Designed to  make connections between learning science, technology, engineering or
mathematics and career opportunities in science, technology, engineering or mathematics.
(4) When evaluating applications for a grant, the council:
(a) Shall  give priority to applications for activities or projects that produce the largest impact
at the lowest cost or for the greatest  number of students throughout this state, including grants for
activities or projects that:
(A) Are determined by the council to be likely to become self-supporting within three years;
(B) Expand evidence-based,  effective practices in science, technology, engineering or mathemat-
ics;
Enrolled House Bill 3038 (HB 3038-B) Page 3
(C) Can be replicated by other entities in this state;
(D) Show evidence of attracting matching funds;
[(E) If  the applicant is an entity identified in subsection (3)(a)(A) to (C) of this section, have de-
monstrable support from the governing body of the entity; ]
[(F)] (E) Help improve access by underrepresented groups to activities  that involve science,
technology, engineering or mathematics; or
[(G)] (F) Are elements of a partnership or a regional effort to improve student achievement in
science, technology, engineering or mathematics;
(b) May give priority to applications for activities or projects that benefit students  in more than
one student group among students in kindergarten through  grade 12, students in community colleges
and students in universities;
(c) Shall attempt to achieve a balance, as determined  by the council, among grants that are
awarded for the sole benefit of students in kindergarten through grade 12, students in  community
colleges and students in universities; and
(d) Shall take into consideration geographic and demographic diversity.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 327.380 by section 2  of this 2025 Act apply to grant
applications submitted on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3a. ORS 327.376 is repealed.
APPROVED RECOVERY SCHOOLS
SECTION 4.  ORS 338.155 is amended to read:
338.155. (1)(a) Except as provided by paragraph (d) of  this subsection,  students of a public
charter school [ shall be ] are considered to be residents of the school district in which the public
charter school is located for purposes of distribution of the State School Fund.
(b) All amounts to be distributed from the State School  Fund for public charter schools shall
first be distributed to the school district in which the public charter school is located.
(c) For the purpose of determining the amounts to  be distributed to a school district from the
State School Fund  for a public charter school, the district extended ADMw described in ORS 327.013
shall be calculated:
(A) Except as  provided by subparagraph (B) or (C) of this paragraph, as though the students
enrolled at a public charter school are students enrolled at the public  schools of the school district
in which the public charter school is located.
(B) By not including any portion of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous school
year if the public charter school ceased to operate because of dissolution or closure or  because of
termination or nonrenewal of a charter.
(C) By calculating the current school  year’s ADMw separately for a virtual public charter
school and for the school district if the school district,  without consideration of the ADM of the
virtual public charter  school, had a decrease in ADM or ADMw compared to the previous school
year.
(d) Students who are enrolled in a public charter  school that is an approved recovery
school under ORS 336.680 are not considered  residents of the school district in which the
public charter school is located for purposes of distribution of the State School  Fund. A
public charter school that is an approved recovery school shall be funded  as provided by ORS
336.680.
(2) A school district shall contractually establish, with  any public charter school that is spon-
sored by the board of the school district, payment for provision of educational services  to the public
charter school’s students. The payment shall equal an amount per weighted average  daily member-
ship (ADMw) of the public charter school that is at least equal to:
(a) Eighty  percent of the amount of the school district’s General Purpose Grant per ADMw as
calculated under ORS 327.013 for students who are  enrolled in kindergarten through grade eight;
and
Enrolled House Bill 3038 (HB 3038-B) Page 4
(b) Ninety-five percent of the amount of the school district’s  General Purpose Grant per ADMw
as calculated under ORS 327.013 for students who are enrolled in grades 9 through 12.
(3) A school district shall contractually establish, with  any public charter school that is spon-
sored by the State Board of Education and that is within the boundaries  of the school district,
payment for provision of educational services to the public charter school’s students.  The payment
shall equal an amount per weighted average  daily membership (ADMw) of the public charter school
that is at least equal to:
(a) Ninety percent of  the amount of the school district’s General Purpose Grant per ADMw as
calculated under ORS 327.013 for students who are  enrolled in kindergarten through grade eight;
and
(b) Ninety-five percent of the amount of the school district’s  General Purpose Grant per ADMw
as calculated under ORS 327.013 for students who are enrolled in grades 9 through 12.
(4) The estimated amount of each school district’s General  Purpose Grant per ADMw shall be
determined each year by the Department of Education and made available to all school districts.
(5) The school district in  which the public charter school is located shall transfer an amount
per weighted average daily membership (ADMw) of the public charter school that is equal to  50
percent of the amount of the  school district’s General Purpose Grant per ADMw as calculated under
ORS 327.013 that is not paid to the public charter school through a contract created pursuant to
subsection (3) of this section to the Department of Education.
(6) The department may use any moneys received under  this section for activities related to
public charter schools.
(7) A school district and a  public charter school may negotiate to establish a payment for the
provision of educational services to the public charter school’s students  that is more than the min-
imum amounts specified in subsection (2) or (3) of this section.
(8) A school district shall send payment to a public charter school based  on a contract negoti-
ated under this section within 10 days after receiving payments from the State School Fund pursuant
to ORS 327.095.
(9)(a) A public charter school may apply for any grant that is available to school  districts or
nonchartered public schools from  the Department of Education. The department shall consider the
application of the public charter school  in the same manner as an application from a school district
or nonchartered public school.
(b) The department shall award  any grant that is available to school districts based solely on
the weighted average daily membership  (ADMw) of the school district directly to the public charter
school. This paragraph does not apply to any grant from the State School Fund.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 338.165 is amended to read:
338.165. [(1)(a)] (1) Except  as provided by ORS 336.680 for public charter schools that are
approved recovery schools:
(a) The school district in  which a public charter school is located shall identify, locate and
evaluate students enrolled in the public charter school to determine  which students may be in need
of special education and related services.
(b) The school district in which a public charter school is located:
(A) Shall receive funding from the State School Fund as provided by this section for  students
who are eligible for special education and related services and  who are enrolled in the public
charter school; and
(B) Is eligible to receive high cost disabilities grants as provided  by ORS 327.348 for students
who are enrolled in the public charter school.
(c) Students who are eligible for special education and related services shall be  considered stu-
dents of the school district in which the public charter  school is located for purposes of data col-
lection and reporting.
(2) If a student is enrolled in a public  charter school and is eligible for special education and
related services, an additional amount shall be added to the ADM of  the public charter school as
described in ORS 327.013  (1)(c)(A)(i). The payment per ADMw in the public charter school that is
Enrolled House Bill 3038 (HB 3038-B) Page 5
attributable to the student who is eligible  for special education and related services shall equal an
amount that is at least equal to:
(a) 40 percent of the amount of the  General Purpose Grant per ADMw for the school district in
which the public charter school is located,  as calculated under ORS 327.013, for students who are
enrolled in kindergarten through grade eight; and
(b) 47.5 percent of the amount of the General Purpose  Grant per ADMw for the school district
in which the public charter school is located, as calculated under ORS 327.013,  for students who are
enrolled in grades 9 through 12.
(3) If the State Board of Education is the sponsor of a public  charter school, the school district
in which the public charter school is located, for each ADMw that is attributable to  a student en-
rolled in a public charter school who is eligible for special education  and related services, shall
transfer five percent of the amount of the school district’s  General Purpose Grant per ADMw as
calculated under ORS 327.013 to the State Board of Education.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of  this section, a school district and a public charter school
may negotiate on a case-by-case basis for an alternative distribution of funds other than the dis-
tribution prescribed by subsection (2) of this section.
(5) Payments under this section  must be made within 10 days after a school district receives
payment from the State School Fund pursuant to ORS 327.095.
SECTION 6.
(1) The amendments to ORS 338.155  and 338.165 by sections 4 and 5 of this
2025 Act first apply to the 2024-2025 school year.
(2) For the 2024-2025 school year,  the Department of Education shall adjust the distrib-
ution to a school district to reflect any differences in the amount to be distributed under
ORS 338.155 and 338.165 and the amount to be distributed under ORS 336.680 for a public
charter school that is an approved recovery school.
OREGON SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
SECTION 7.
 ORS 346.010 is amended to read:
346.010. (1) Pursuant to rules of  the State Board of Education, the Superintendent of Public In-
struction  shall  provide free training and education services in a school located in Marion County
for children who are deaf , hard of hearing or deaf-blind .
(2) The Superintendent  of Public Instruction shall indicate which facilities shall serve as the
Oregon School for the Deaf.
(3) The superintendent may order a change in all or part in the purpose and use of the  facilities
available under this section whenever  the superintendent determines that a change in purpose and
use will better enable the state to meet its  responsibilities for the education and training of children
who are deaf , hard of hearing or deaf-blind .
(4) The school shall be  operated primarily for the provision of education and training services
for children who  are deaf , hard of hearing or deaf-blind and who cannot be efficiently served in
other schools or programs.
SECTION 8.  ORS 346.015 is amended to read:
346.015. (1) Prior to convening a meeting to prepare an individualized education  program or an
education plan developed in accordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973,  29
U.S.C. 794,  for a  child with an intellectual disability or a developmental disability for whom place-
ment at the school operated  under ORS 346.010 may be considered, the agency that is providing the
education for the child shall notify the local community developmental disabilities program. The
case manager responsible for  programs for children with intellectual disabilities or developmental
disabilities, in consultation with the Department  of Human Services, shall evaluate whether the
child also has needs for alternative  residential care or other support services. If the evaluation de-
termines this to be the case, but documents that community resources are not available  to meet
these needs, the school district may proceed with the meeting to prepare the individualized educa-
Enrolled House Bill 3038 (HB 3038-B) Page 6
tion program or education plan in which placement at the school operated under ORS 346.010 may
be considered.
(2) An agency providing education under subsection (1) of this section may initiate the  proce-
dure in subsection (1) of this section for any  child who does not have an intellectual disability or
a developmental  disability when in the agency’s judgment a treatment or residential issue is
prompting proposed placement under ORS 346.010.
(3) A child may not be placed in the school operated under ORS 346.010 unless :
(a) The district superintendent or  the superintendent’s designee has signed a statement declar-
ing that :
(A) For a child with an individualized education  program, the district cannot provide a free
appropriate public education for the  child commensurate with the needs of the child as identified
by the individualized education program of the child and that the school is the  least restrictive en-
vironment in which the child can be educated.
(B) For a child with an  education plan developed in accordance with section 504 of the
Rehabilitation Act of 1973,  29 U.S.C. 794, the district cannot make reasonable accommo-
dations for the child  commensurate with the needs of the child as identified in the education
plan of the child.
(b) The  parent or guardian of the child consents to the placement of the child, as pro-
vided by rules adopted by the State Board of Education.
(4) By rule, the  State Board of Education shall determine procedures to be followed by local
education agencies in carrying out this section.
SECTION 9.  ORS 346.035 is amended to read:
346.035. For a child who is enrolled under ORS 346.010 and who has  an intellectual disability
or a  developmental disability, the Department of Education shall notify the community develop-
mental disabilities program of the education plan developed in accordance  with section 504 of
the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794,  and the date of the annual review of the individ-
ualized education program of the child for the purpose of including in the review the assigned  case
manager’s assessment of community resources that are available  for treatment or residential needs
the child might have.
SECTION 10.  ORS 346.041 is amended to read:
346.041. (1) Transportation for pupils  attending the school operated under ORS 346.010 is the
responsibility of the  pupil’s resident school district. The district may provide transportation directly
or by agreement with another school district, a public carrier or the Department of Education.
(2) The actual and necessary transportation expenses incurred under subsection  (1) of this sec-
tion, at a frequency consistent  with a pupil’s individualized education program or the education
plan developed in accordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 , 29 U.S.C. 794,
shall be considered approved transportation costs for purposes of ORS 327.006 and 327.033.
(3) The resident school  district shall reimburse the Department of Education for all transporta-
tion costs the department incurs on behalf of the district  within 10 days after receipt of the itemized
invoice.
(4) The payments of the resident school districts required under subsection  (3) of this section
and an  amount specifically appropriated thereto shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the
credit of the Special Education Transportation Revolving Account to be used by the Department of
Education for the transportation of pupils attending the school operated under ORS 346.010. The
account shall be continuously appropriated to the department for such purpose.
(5) Any unexpended and  unobligated balance in the Special Education Transportation Revolving
Account in excess of $70,000 as of September 1 of any  year shall be transferred from the account
to the General Fund to be available for general governmental purposes.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 346.070 is amended to read:
346.070. (1) Subject  to subsection (3) of this section, every student who is deaf , hard of hearing
or deaf-blind and who has been a resident of Oregon for the three years immediately  preceding
application and who is attending any university, college  or other suitable school is eligible to apply
Enrolled House Bill 3038 (HB 3038-B) Page 7
for a state  grant-in-aid to help defray approved expenses. If the student’s application for a grant-in-
aid is approved by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Department of Education  may make
the grant-in-aid contingent upon the student’s attending a school of the superintendent’s choice.
(2) The grants-in-aid shall not exceed  $1,000 to any student for any fiscal year and shall be paid
out of any funds appropriated to the department for that purpose. The State Board of Education
may adopt rules necessary to carry out this section.
(3) A student who is deaf , hard of hearing or deaf-blind  may not receive a grant-in-aid under
subsection (1) of this section for a period exceeding seven years.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 346.091 is amended to read:
346.091. (1) As used in this section, “school district” means a common or union high  school
district, an education service district, a state-operated school or any  legally constituted combination
of such entities.
(2) The Legislative Assembly finds and declares  that children who are deaf, hard of hearing or
deaf-blind who utilize one or more modes of communication  have the same rights and potential as
children who are not deaf, hard of hearing or deaf-blind.
(3) School districts shall:
(a) Provide children who are  deaf, hard of hearing or deaf-blind appropriate screening and as-
sessment of hearing and vision capabilities and communication and language  needs at the earliest
possible age and the continuation of screening and evaluation services  throughout the educational
experience.
(b) Provide  children who are deaf, hard of hearing or deaf-blind with individualized and appro-
priate early intervention to support the acquisition of solid language bases developed at the earliest
possible  age.
(c) Inform the parents or guardians of children who are  deaf, hard of hearing or deaf-blind about
all relevant services  and programs and placement considerations, including the Oregon School for
the Deaf, and  provide opportunities for parents and guardians to fully participate in the development
and implementation of their child’s education plan.
(d) Strive to provide children who are  deaf, hard of hearing or deaf-blind opportunities to meet
and associate with adult role models  who are deaf, hard of hearing or deaf-blind and who utilize
varied communication modalities to learn advocacy skills, including self-advocacy.
(e) Provide children who are deaf, hard of hearing or deaf-blind opportunities to meet and  as-
sociate with their peers in the school environment and during school-sponsored activities.
(f) Provide direct instruction to children who are deaf, hard of hearing or deaf-blind.
(g) Ensure individualized  education programs or education plans developed in accordance
with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973,  29 U.S.C. 794, that are developed, reviewed
and revised for children who are deaf, hard of hearing or deaf-blind include  communication and ed-
ucational  plans.
(h) Provide children  who are deaf, hard of hearing or deaf-blind placement that is best suited
to each child’s individual  needs including, but not limited to, social, emotional, communication and
cultural  needs,  with consideration for the each child’s age, degree and type of hearing loss, academic
level, mode of communication, style of learning, motivational level and amount of family support.
(i) Provide children who are deaf, hard of hearing  or deaf-blind individual considerations for
free, appropriate education or for  reasonable accommodations across a continuum of placement
options required by law.
(j) Provide children  who are deaf, hard of hearing or deaf-blind full support services provided
by qualified and certified professionals in their educational settings.
(k) Provide children who are deaf, hard of hearing or deaf-blind  full communication access to
all programs  in the child’s educational settings including, but not limited to, extracurricular activ-
ities, recess, lunch, media showings, driver education and public announcements.
(L) Ensure that parents and  guardians of children who are deaf, hard of hearing or deaf-blind
receive information from appropriately qualified and certified professionals on the  medical, ethical,
cultural and linguistic issues concerning individuals who are deaf, hard of hearing or deaf-blind.
Enrolled House Bill 3038 (HB 3038-B) Page 8
(m) Ensure that children who are deaf, hard of hearing or deaf-blind have direct access  to
mental health and supporting services from qualified and certified  providers fluent in the child’s
primary mode of communication, including American Sign Language.
EMERGENCY DRILLS AND INSTRUCTION
SECTION 13. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Evacuate” means a procedure used  when students and staff need to move from one
location to another.
(b) “Hold” means a procedure used to keep students and staff in classrooms while  a dis-
ruption or minor emergency is resolved.
(c) “Lockdown” means a procedure used when a threat or hazard is inside the building.
(d) “Secure” means a procedure used when a threat or hazard is outside the building.
(e) “Shelter in place” is a procedure used to respond to and take  protective actions based
on a threat or hazard that may include an earthquake, tsunami or other natural or envi-
ronmental hazard.
(2) Each school  district must maintain a comprehensive safety program for all students
and staff. The program must include procedures for:
(a) Responding to emergency situations that address an  immediate threat to safety, in-
cluding an evacuation, a hold, a lockdown, a secure and a shelter in place;
(b) Providing communicable disease management;
(c) Responding to medical emergencies; and
(d) Providing instruction as described in ORS 336.071.
(3) The State Board of  Education may adopt rules related to a program required under
this section.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 336.071 is amended to read:
336.071. (1) All schools are required to instruct and drill students on emergency procedures  so
that the students can respond  to an emergency without confusion or panic. The emergency proce-
dures shall include drills and instruction on:
(a) Fires;
(b) Earthquakes, which shall include  tsunami drills and instruction in schools in a tsunami
hazard zone; and
(c) Safety threats , as identified in section 13 (2)(a) of this 2025 Act .
(2)(a) Drills and instruction on fire emergencies shall include routes and methods of exiting  the
school  building.
(b) Drills  and instruction on earthquake emergencies shall include the earthquake emergency
response procedure known as “drop,  cover and hold on.” A school may drill earthquake emergency
response procedures in addition to “drop, cover and hold on”  when the school determines, based on
evaluation of specific engineering and structural issues related to a building, that  “drop, cover and
hold on” may not be the most effective  earthquake emergency response procedure to prevent or
limit injury or loss of life.
(c) Drills  and instruction on tsunami emergencies shall include immediate evacuation after an
earthquake when appropriate or after a tsunami  warning to protect students against inundation by
tsunamis.
(d) Drills and instruction on safety threats shall include:
(A) Procedures related to evacuation, hold, lockdown, [ lockout,] secure and  shelter in place
[and evacuation ], as those  terms are defined in section 13 of this 2025 Act,  including the proce-
dures described in ORS 339.324; and
(B) Other appropriate actions to take when there is a threat to safety.
(3)(a) At least 30 minutes in each school month shall be  used to instruct students on the emer-
gency  procedures  described in subsection (1) of this section  and at least one drill shall be con-
ducted each school month .
Enrolled House Bill 3038 (HB 3038-B) Page 9
(b) At least two drills on earthquakes shall be conducted each year.
(c) At least [ two drills on safety threats ] one drill on each safety threat  shall be conducted
each year.
(d) In schools in a tsunami hazard zone, at least three drills on earthquakes and tsunamis  shall
be conducted each year.
(4)(a) In addition to the instruction required under subsection (3) of this section,  schools are
encouraged to instruct students, in  an age-appropriate manner, on preparing for and recovering from
events that are:
(A) Described in subsection (1) of this section; and
(B) Natural disasters specific to the region where the school  is located, including any relevant
weather-related events such as flooding, drought or excessive snowfall.
(b) For the purpose of this subsection, the Department of Education shall:
(A) Develop, in consultation with the Oregon Department of Emergency  Management, guidance
that may be used for the instruction and make the guidance available to school districts; and
(B) Provide, when requested, professional development to teachers and administrators relating
to the guidance.
(5) All schools shall  maintain all exit doors so that the doors can be opened from the inside
without a key during school hours.
(6) Units of  local government and state agencies associated with emergency procedures training
and planning shall:
(a) Review emergency procedures proposed by schools  under section 13 of this 2025 Act ; and
(b) Assist schools in the instruction and drilling of students in emergency procedures.
(7) As used in this section, “school” means any:
(a) Kindergarten through grade 12 public or private school; or
(b) Educational institution having an average daily attendance of 50 or more students.
SECTION 14a.
If House Bill 3083  becomes law, section 14 of this 2025 Act (amending ORS
336.071) is repealed and ORS 336.071, as amended by section 1, chapter 208, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled House Bill 3083), is amended to read:
336.071. (1) As used in this section, “school” means any:
(a) Kindergarten through grade 12 public or private school, including a public  charter school;
or
(b) Educational institution having an average daily attendance of 50 or more students.
(2) Every school is required to have  emergency safeguards to protect the safety and well-being
of students and staff at the school. The emergency safeguards must include:
(a) Drills and instruction on emergency procedures so that students can respond to  an emer-
gency without confusion or panic.
(b) Policies and procedures relating to school building security.
(3) When reviewing policies and procedures relating to school building  security, the governing
body for a school shall consider the installation of a panic alarm system that:
(a) Is wireless or consists of wearable panic alarms;
(b) Is capable of connecting to diverse emergency services technologies to ensure real-time  co-
ordination between multiple emergency services agencies; and
(c) Integrates with local public safety answering points to transmit 9-1-1 calls  and mobile acti-
vations.
(4) The drills and instruction on emergency procedures required by this section must be on:
(a) Fires;
(b) Earthquakes, which shall include  tsunami drills and instruction in schools in a tsunami
hazard zone; and
(c) Safety threats , as identified in section 13 (2)(a) of this 2025 Act .
(5)(a) Drills and instruction on fire emergencies shall include routes and methods of exiting  the
school  building.
Enrolled House Bill 3038 (HB 3038-B) Page 10
(b) Drills  and instruction on earthquake emergencies shall include the earthquake emergency
response procedure known as “drop,  cover and hold on.” A school may drill earthquake emergency
response procedures in addition to “drop, cover and hold on”  when the school determines, based on
evaluation of specific engineering and structural issues related to a building, that  “drop, cover and
hold on” may not be the most effective  earthquake emergency response procedure to prevent or
limit injury or loss of life.
(c) Drills  and instruction on tsunami emergencies shall include immediate evacuation after an
earthquake when appropriate or after a tsunami  warning to protect students against inundation by
tsunamis.
(d) Drills and instruction on safety threats shall include:
(A) Procedures related to  evacuation, hold,  lockdown, [ lockout,] secure and shelter in place
[and evacuation ], as those  terms are defined in section 13 of this 2025 Act,  including the proce-
dures described in ORS 339.324; and
(B) Other appropriate actions to take when there is a threat to safety.
(6)(a) At least 30 minutes in each  school month shall be used to instruct students on the drills
and instruction on emergency procedures described in subsection (4) of  this section  and at least
one drill shall be conducted each school month .
(b) At least two drills on earthquakes shall be conducted each year.
(c) At least [ two drills on safety threats ] one  drill on each safety threat  shall be conducted
each year.
(d) In schools in a tsunami hazard zone, at least three drills on earthquakes and tsunamis  shall
be conducted each year.
(7)(a) In addition  to the instruction required under subsection (6) of this section, schools are
encouraged to instruct students, in  an age-appropriate manner, on preparing for and recovering from
events that are:
(A) Described in subsection (4) of this section; and
(B) Natural disasters specific to the  region where the school is located, including any relevant
weather-related events such as flooding, drought or excessive snowfall.
(b) For the purpose of this subsection, the Department of Education shall:
(A) Develop, in  consultation with the Oregon Department of Emergency Management, guidance
that may be used for the instruction and make the guidance available to schools; and
(B) Provide, when requested, professional development to teachers and administrators relating
to the guidance.
(8) All schools shall maintain all exit doors so that the doors can be opened  from the inside
without a key during school hours.
(9) Units of  local government and state agencies associated with emergency procedures training
and planning shall:
(a) Review emergency  procedures and safeguards proposed by  schools  under this section and
section 13 of this 2025 Act ; and
(b) Assist schools in the instruction and drilling of students in emergency procedures.
SECTION 15.
The amendments to ORS 336.071  by section 14 of this 2025 Act become op-
erative on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 15a.  If House Bill 3083 becomes law, section 15 of this 2025  Act is amended to read:
Sec. 15.  The amendments to ORS 336.071 by section [ 14] 14a of this  2025 Act become operative
on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 16.  ORS 339.324 is amended to read:
339.324. (1) As used in this section, “safety threat action”  means a [ lockdown, lockout, shelter in
place or evacuation ] response to a safety threat, as identified in section  13 (2)(a) of this 2025
Act,  that:
(a) Is initiated by a school in response to a safety threat; and
(b) Is not a planned drill.
Enrolled House Bill 3038 (HB 3038-B) Page 11
(2) Each school district board shall adopt  a policy for notifying the school community when a
school takes a safety threat action.
(3) The policy adopted under this section must require that:
(a) As expediently as possible, but no  later than 24 hours after the initiation of a safety threat
action, a school or school district shall provide an  electronic communication to parents and guard-
ians of students attending the school at which  the safety threat action occurred. The communication
must include:
(A) A general description of the issue that caused the safety threat action to be taken;
(B) The duration of time that  the safety threat action was taken, from when the action was in-
itiated until when it concluded;
(C) Actions taken by the school or school district to resolve the situation that  caused the safety
threat action and actions taken to protect student safety; and
(D) An explanation of how the situation was resolved.
(b) The communication required under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be  provided in a
manner that communicates relevant facts and details as may be necessary or useful:
(A) For parents and guardians to understand any potential threats to student safety; and
(B) To  assist parents and guardians in helping students understand and mentally process the
incident and any resulting trauma.
(c) The  communication required under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be provided and
made available in culturally appropriate languages to communicate effectively with parents and
guardians of students of the school or school district.
(d) As expediently as possible, but no later than 24 hours after  the initiation of a safety threat
action, a school or school district shall provide an electronic communication to  school district em-
ployees who are employees of the school at which the safety threat  action occurred. The communi-
cation required under this  paragraph must include the same information described in paragraph (a)
of this subsection and any additional  information as may be permitted by relevant confidentiality
and privacy requirements.
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 17.
The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 18. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 3038 (HB 3038-B) Page 12
Passed by House April 10, 2025
Repassed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 12, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3038 (HB 3038-B) Page 13